North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 2. Powers and Duties of Department and Board of Transportation.
§ 136-28.13.
Participation in the energy credit banking and selling program.

The Department of Transportation shall participate in the energy credit banking and selling program under

G.S. 143-58.4

and is eligible to receive proceeds from the Alternative Fuel Revolving Fund under

G.S. 143-58.5

to purchase alternative fuel, develop alternative fuel refueling infrastructure, or purchase AFVs as defined in

G.S. 143-58.4

.

History.

2005-413, s. 2.

§ 136-28.14.
Project contractor licensing requirements.

The letting of contracts under this Chapter for the following types of projects shall not be subject to the licensing requirements of Article 1 of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes:

Routine maintenance and minor repair of pavements, bridges, roadside vegetation and plantings, drainage systems, concrete sidewalks, curbs, gutters, and rest areas.

Installation and maintenance of pavement markings and markers, ground mounted signs, guardrail, fencing, and roadside vegetation and plantings.

History.

2006-261, s. 1.

§ 136-28.15.
Diesel vehicles purchase warranty requirement.

Every new motor vehicle transferred to or purchased by the Department of Transportation that is designed to operate on diesel fuel shall be covered by an express manufacturer’s warranty that allows the use of B-20 fuel, as defined in

G.S. 143-58.4

. This section does not apply if the intended use, as determined by the Department, of the new motor vehicle requires a type of vehicle for which an express manufacturer’s warranty allows the use of B-20 fuel is not available.

History.

2007-420, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to manufacturer’s warranty for State motor vehicles that operate on diesel fuel, see

G.S. 20-351.11

.

§ 136-29.
Adjustment and resolution of Department of Transportation contract claim.

A contractor who has completed a contract with the Department of Transportation let in accordance with Article 2 of this Chapter and who has not received the amount he claims is due under the contract may submit a verified written claim to the Secretary of Transportation for the amount the contractor claims is due. The claim shall be submitted within 60 days after the contractor receives his final statement from the Department and shall state the factual basis for the claim.The Secretary or the Secretary’s designee shall investigate a submitted claim within 90 days of receiving the claim or within any longer time period agreed to by the Secretary or the Secretary’s designee and the contractor. The contractor may appear before the Secretary or the Secretary’s designee, either in person or through counsel, to present facts and arguments in support of the claim. The Secretary or the Secretary’s designee may allow, deny, or compromise the claim, in whole or in part. The Secretary or the Secretary’s designee shall give the contractor a written statement of the decision on the contractor’s claim.

A contractor who is dissatisfied with the Secretary or the Secretary’s designee’s decision on the contractor’s claim may commence a contested case on the claim under Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The contested case shall be commenced within 60 days of receiving the written statement of the decision.

As to any portion of a claim that is denied by the Secretary or the Secretary’s designee, the contractor may, in lieu of the procedures set forth in subsection (b) of this section, within six months of receipt of the final decision, institute a civil action for the sum he claims to be entitled to under the contract by filing a verified complaint and the issuance of a summons in the Superior Court of Wake County or in the superior court of any county where the work under the contract was performed. The procedure shall be the same as in all civil actions except that all issues shall be tried by the judge, without a jury.

The provisions of this section shall be part of every contract let in accordance with Article 2 of this Chapter between the Department of Transportation and a contractor. A provision in a contract that conflicts with this section is invalid.

History.

1939, c. 318; 1947, c. 530; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1963, c. 667; 1965, c. 55, s. 11; 1967, c. 873; 1973, c. 507, ss. 5, 17, 18; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1983, c. 761, s. 191; 1987, c. 847, s. 3; 2009-266, s. 16.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-266, s. 16, effective August 1, 2009, in the section catchline, substituted “Department of Transportation” for “highway construction;” substituted “Secretary or the Secretary’s designee” for “State Highway Administrator” and “State Highway Administrator’s” throughout the section; in subsection (a), in the first paragraph, substituted “let in accordance with Article 2 of this Chapter” for “to construct a State highway” and “Secretary of Transportation” for “State Highway Administrator” in the first sentence, and in the second paragraph, in the second sentence, substituted “the claim” for “his claim”, and in the last sentence, deleted “State Highway Administrator’s” preceding “decision”; in subsection (b), deleted “State Highway Administrator’s” preceding “written” in the last sentence; and, in subsection (d), substituted “let in accordance with Article 2 of this Chapter” for “for State highway construction” in the first sentence.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on this section prior to the 1963 amendment, see 17 N.C.L. Rev. 340 (1939).

For note on abrogation of contractual sovereign immunity, see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1082 (1976).

For survey of North Carolina construction law, see 21 Wake Forest L. Rev. 633 (1986).

For article, “North Carolina Construction Law Survey II,” see 22 Wake Forest L. Rev. 481 (1987).

§ 136-30.
Uniform signs and other traffic control devices on highways, streets, and public vehicular areas.

State Highway System. — The Department of Transportation may number and mark highways in the State highway system. All traffic signs and other traffic control devices placed on a highway in the State highway system must conform to the Uniform Manual. The Department of Transportation shall have the power to control all signs within the right-of-way of highways in the State highway system. The Department of Transportation may erect signs directing persons to roads and places of importance.

Municipal Street System. — All traffic signs and other traffic control devices placed on a municipal street system street must conform to the appearance criteria of the Uniform Manual. All traffic control devices placed on a highway that is within the corporate limits of a municipality but is part of the State highway system must be approved by the Department of Transportation.

Public Vehicular Areas. — Except as provided in this subsection, all traffic signs and other traffic control devices placed on a public vehicular area, as defined in

G.S. 20-4.01

, must conform to the Uniform Manual. The owner of private property that contains a public vehicular area may place on the property a traffic control device, other than a sign designating a parking space for handicapped persons, as defined in

G.S. 20-37.5

, that differs in material from the uniform device but does not differ in shape, size, color, or any other way from the uniform device. The owner of private property that contains a public vehicular area may place on the property a sign designating a parking space for handicapped persons that differs in material and color from the uniform sign but does not differ in shape, size, or any other way from the uniform device.

Definition. — As used in this section, the term “Uniform Manual” means the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways, published by the United States Department of Transportation, and any supplement to that Manual adopted by the North Carolina Department of Transportation.

Exception for Public Airport Traffic Signs. — Publicly owned airports, as defined in Chapter 63 of the General Statutes, shall be exempt from the requirements of subsections (b) and (c) of this section with respect to informational and directional signs, but not with respect to regulatory traffic signs.

History.

1921, c. 2, ss. 9(a), 9(b); C.S., ss. 3846(q), 3846(r); 1927, c. 148, s. 54; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1991, c. 530, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 818, s. 2; 1993, c. 51, s. 1.

§ 136-30.1.
Center line and pavement edge line markings.

The Department of Transportation shall mark with center lines and edge lines all interstate and primary roads and all paved secondary roads having an average traffic volume of 100 vehicles per day or more, and which are traffic service roads forming a connecting link in the State highway system. The Department of Transportation shall not be required to mark with center and edge lines local subdivision roads, loop roads, dead-end roads of less than one mile in length or roads the major purpose of which is to serve the abutting property, nor shall the Department of Transportation be required to mark with edge lines those roads on which curbing has been installed or which are less than 16 feet in width.

Whenever the Department of Transportation shall construct a new paved road, relocate an existing paved road, resurface an existing paved road, or pave an existing road which under the provisions of subsection (a) hereof is required to be marked with lines, the Department of Transportation shall, within 30 days from the completion of the construction, resurfacing or paving, mark the said road with the lines required in subsection (a) hereof.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 530, s. 2, effective January 1, 1992.

History.

1969, c. 1172, s. 1; 1973, c. 496, ss. 1, 2; c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1991, c. 530, s. 2.

§ 136-30.2.
Prohibit the use of high content arsenic glass beads in paint used for pavement marking.

No pavement markings shall be placed on or along any road in the State highway system, in any municipal street system, or on any public vehicular area, as defined in

G.S. 20-4.01

, that is made from paint that has been mixed, in whole or in part, with reflective glass beads containing more than 75 parts per million inorganic arsenic, as determined by the United States Environmental Protection Agency Method 6010B in conjunction with the United States Environmental Protection Agency Method 3052 modified.

History.

2010-180, s. 17(b).

§ 136-31.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 530, s. 3.

§ 136-32.
Regulation of signs.

Commercial Signs. — No unauthorized person shall erect or maintain upon any highway any warning or direction sign, marker, signal or light or imitation of any official sign, marker, signal or light erected under the provisions of

G.S. 136-30

, except in cases of emergency. No person shall erect or maintain upon any highway any traffic or highway sign or signal bearing thereon any commercial or political advertising, except as provided in subsections (b) through (e) of this section: Provided, nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the erection or maintenance of signs, markers, or signals bearing thereon the name of an organization authorized to erect the same by the Department of Transportation or by any local authority referred to in

G.S. 136-31

. Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The Department of Transportation may remove any signs erected without authority or allowed to remain beyond the deadline established in subsection (b) of this section.

Compliant Political Signs Permitted. — During the period beginning on the 30th day before the beginning date of “one-stop” early voting under

G.S. 163-227.2

and ending on the 10th day after the primary or election day, persons may place political signs in the right-of-way of the State highway system as provided in this section. Signs must be placed in compliance with subsection (d) of this section and must be removed by the end of the period prescribed in this subsection. Any political sign remaining in the right-of-way of the State highway system more than 30 days after the end of the period prescribed in this subsection shall be deemed unlawfully placed and abandoned property, and a person may remove and dispose of such political sign without penalty.

Definition. — For purposes of this section, “political sign” means any sign that advocates for political action. The term does not include a commercial sign.

Sign Placement. — The permittee must obtain the permission of any property owner of a residence, business, or religious institution fronting the right-of-way where a sign would be erected. Signs must be placed in accordance with the following:

No sign shall be permitted in the right-of-way of a fully controlled access highway.

No sign shall be closer than three feet from the edge of the pavement of the road.

No sign shall obscure motorist visibility at an intersection.

No sign shall be higher than 42 inches above the edge of the pavement of the road.

No sign shall be larger than 864 square inches.

No sign shall obscure or replace another sign.

Penalties for Unlawful Removal of Signs. — It is a Class 3 misdemeanor for a person to steal, deface, vandalize, or unlawfully remove a political sign that is lawfully placed under this section.

Application Within Municipalities. — Pursuant to Article 8 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, a city may by ordinance prohibit or regulate the placement of political signs on rights-of-way of streets located within the corporate limits of a municipality and maintained by the municipality. Any such ordinance shall provide that any political sign that remains in a right-of-way of streets located within the corporate limits of a municipality and maintained by the municipality more than 30 days after the end of the period prescribed in the ordinance is to be deemed unlawfully placed and abandoned property, and a person may remove and dispose of such political sign without penalty. In the absence of an ordinance prohibiting or regulating the placement of political signs on the rights-of-way of streets located within a municipality and maintained by the municipality, the provisions of subsections (b) through (e) of this section shall apply.

History.

1921, c. 2, s. 9(b); C.S., s. 3846(r); 1927, c. 148, ss. 56, 58; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 39; 1993, c. 539, s. 981; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2011-408, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1; 2019-119, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to general ordinance-making power of cities, see

G.S. 160A-174

et seq.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “G.S. 163A-1300” for “G.S. 163-227.2” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the change to the reference in subsection (b).

§ 136-32.1.
Misleading signs prohibited.

No person shall erect or maintain within 100 feet of any highway right-of-way any warning or direction sign or marker of the same shape, design, color and size of any official highway sign or marker erected under the provisions of

G.S. 136-30

, or otherwise so similar to an official sign or marker as to appear to be an official highway sign or marker. Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1955, c. 231; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 40; 1993, c. 539, s. 982; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 136-32.2.
Placing blinding, deceptive or distracting lights unlawful.

If any person, firm or corporation shall place or cause to be placed any lights, which are flashing, moving, rotating, intermittent or steady spotlights, in such a manner and place and of such intensity:

Which, by the use of flashing or blinding lights, blinds, tends to blind and effectively hampers the vision of the operator of any motor vehicle passing on a public highway; or

Which involves red, green or amber lights or reflectorized material and which resembles traffic signal lights or traffic control signs; or

Which, by the use of lights, reasonably causes the operator of any motor vehicle passing upon a public highway to mistakenly believe that there is approaching or situated in his lane of travel some other motor vehicle or obstacle, device or barricade, which would impede his traveling in such lane;

[he or it] shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Each 10 days during which a violation of the provisions of this section is continued after conviction therefor shall be deemed a separate offense.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any lights or lighting devices erected or maintained by the Department of Transportation or other properly constituted State or local authorities and intended to effect or implement traffic control and safety. Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to prohibit the otherwise reasonable use of lights or lighting devices for advertising or other lawful purpose when the same do not fall within the provisions of subdivisions (1) through (3) of subsection (a) of this section.

The enforcement of this section shall be the specific responsibility and duty of the State Highway Patrol in addition to all other law-enforcement agencies and officers within this State; provided, however, no warrant shall issue charging a violation of this section unless the violation has continued for 10 days after notice of the same has been given to the person, firm or corporation maintaining or owning such device or devices alleged to be in violation of this section.

History.

1959, c. 560; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1975, c. 716, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, ss. 7.1, 17; 1993, c. 539, s. 983; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 136-32.3.
Litter enforcement signs.

The Department of Transportation shall place signs on the Interstate Highway System notifying motorists of the penalties for littering. The signs shall include the amount of the maximum penalty for littering. The Department of Transportation shall determine the locations of and distance between the signs.

History.

2001-512, s. 4.

§ 136-33.
Damaging or removing signs; rewards.

No person shall willfully deface, damage, knock down or remove any sign posted as provided in

G.S. 136-26

or

G.S. 136-30

.

No person, without just cause or excuse, shall have in his possession any highway sign as provided in

G.S. 136-26

or

G.S. 136-30

.

(b1)

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

The Department of Transportation is authorized to offer a reward not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) for information leading to the arrest and conviction of persons who violate the provisions of this section, such reward to be paid from funds of the Department of Transportation.

The enforcement of this section shall be the specific responsibility and duty of the State Highway Patrol in addition to all other law-enforcement agencies and officers within this State.

History.

1927, c. 148, s. 57; 1971, c. 671; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1975, cc. 11, 93; c. 716, s. 7; 1977, c. 464, ss. 7.1, 18; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 41; 1993, c. 539, s. 984; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 136-33.1.
Signs for protection of cattle.

Upon written request of any owner of more than five head of cattle, the Department of Transportation shall erect appropriate and adequate signs on any road or highway under the control of the Department of Transportation, such signs to be so worded, designed and located as to give adequate warning of the presence and crossing of cattle. Such signs shall be located at points agreed upon by the owner and the Department of Transportation at points selected to give reasonable warning of places customarily or frequently used by the cattle of said owner to cross said road or highway, and no one owner shall be entitled to demand the placing of signs at more than one point on a single or abutting tracts of land.

History.

1949, c. 812; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

§ 136-33.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-164, s. 2, effective July 1, 2007.

Cross References.

For current provisions as to signs marking beginning of speed zones, see

G.S. 136-33.2

A.

§ 136-33.2A.
Signs marking beginning of reduced speed zones.

If a need to reduce speed in a speed zone is determined to exist by an engineer of the Department, there shall be a sign erected, of adequate size, at least 600 feet in advance of the beginning of any speed zone established by any agency of the State authorized to establish the same, which shall indicate a change in the speed limit.

History.

2007-164, s. 3.

§ 136-34.
Department of Transportation authorized to furnish road equipment to municipalities.

The Department of Transportation is hereby authorized to furnish municipalities road maintenance equipment to aid such municipalities in the maintenance of streets upon such rental agreement as may be agreed upon by the Department of Transportation and the said municipality. Such rental, however, is to be at least equal to the cost of operation, plus wear and tear on such equipment; and the Department of Transportation shall not be required to furnish equipment when to do so would interfere with the maintenance of the streets and highways under the control of the Department of Transportation.

History.

1941, c. 299; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, ss. 7.1, 19.

§ 136-34.1.
Department of Transportation authorized to furnish road maintenance materials to municipalities.

The Department of Transportation is authorized, in its discretion, to furnish municipalities road maintenance materials to aid municipalities in the maintenance of streets upon agreement for reimbursement, as may be required by the Department and agreed to by the municipality. The agreement shall provide for reimbursement in an amount at least equal to the cost of the materials, together with the actual reasonable cost of any handling and storage of the materials and of administering the reimbursement agreement, all as solely determined by the Department. In no event shall the Department of Transportation be required to furnish road maintenance materials when, in the sole determination of the Department of Transportation, to do so would interfere with the maintenance of the streets and highways under its control. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the provision of and reimbursement for materials under this section shall not be deemed a sale for any purpose.

History.

2009-332, s. 3.

§ 136-35.
Cooperation with other states and federal government.

It shall also be the duty of the Department of Transportation, where possible, to cooperate with the state highway commissions of other states and with the federal government in the correlation of roads and other transportation systems so as to form a system of intercounty, interstate, and national highways and transportation systems. The Department of Transportation may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states and the United States Department of Transportation to perform inspection work and to pay reasonable fees for inspection work performed by others in connection with supplies and materials used in transportation construction and repair.

History.

1915, c. 113, s. 12; C.S., s. 3584; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1985, c. 127; c. 689, s. 31; 2009-266, s. 17.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-266, s. 17, effective August 1, 2009, in the first sentence, inserted “and other transportation systems” and “and transportation systems”, and in the second sentence, substituted “United States Department of Transportation” for “Federal Highway Administration” and substituted “transportation construction and repair” for “highway construction and repair.”

§ 136-36.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1951, c. 260, s. 4.

§ 136-37.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1959, c. 687, s. 5.

§§ 136-38 through 136-41.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Sessions Laws 1951, c. 260, s. 4.

§ 136-41.1.
Appropriation to municipalities; allocation of funds generally; allocation to Butner.

Upon appropriation of funds by the General Assembly to the Department of Transportation for State aid to municipalities, one-half of the amount appropriated shall be allocated in cash on or before October 1 of each year to the cities and towns of the State in accordance with this section. The second one-half of the amount appropriated shall be allocated in cash on or before January 1 of each year to the cities and towns of the State in accordance with this section.Seventy-five percent (75%) of the funds appropriated for cities and towns shall be distributed among the several eligible municipalities of the State in the percentage proportion that the population of each eligible municipality bears to the total population of all eligible municipalities according to the most recent annual estimates of population as certified to the Secretary of Revenue by the State Budget Officer. This annual estimation of population shall include increases in the population within the municipalities caused by annexations accomplished through July 1 of the calendar year in which these funds are distributed. Twenty-five percent (25%) of said fund shall be distributed among the several eligible municipalities of the State in the percentage proportion that the mileage of public streets in each eligible municipality which does not form a part of the State highway system bears to the total mileage of the public streets in all eligible municipalities which do not constitute a part of the State highway system.It shall be the duty of the mayor of each municipality to report to the Department of Transportation such information as it may request for its guidance in determining the eligibility of each municipality to receive funds under this section and in determining the amount of allocation to which each is entitled. Upon failure of any municipality to make such report within the time prescribed by the Department of Transportation, the Department of Transportation may disregard such defaulting unit in making said allotment.The funds to be allocated under this section shall be paid in cash to the various eligible municipalities on or before October 1 and January 1 of each year as provided in this section. Provided that eligible municipalities are authorized within the discretion of their governing bodies to enter into contracts for the purpose of maintenance, repair, construction, reconstruction, widening, or improving streets of such municipalities at any time after January 1 of any calendar year in total amounts not to exceed ninety percent (90%) of the amount received by such municipality during the preceding fiscal year, in anticipation of the receipt of funds under this section during the next fiscal year, to be paid for out of such funds when received.The Department of Transportation may withhold each year an amount not to exceed one percent (1%) of the total amount appropriated for distribution under this section for the purpose of correcting errors in allocations: Provided, that the amount so withheld and not used for correcting errors will be carried over and added to the amount to be allocated for the following year.The word “street” as used in this section is hereby defined as any public road maintained by a municipality and open to use by the general public, and having an average width of not less than 16 feet. In order to obtain the necessary information to distribute the funds herein allocated, the Department of Transportation may require that each municipality eligible to receive funds under this section submit to it a statement, certified by a registered engineer or surveyor of the total number of miles of streets in such municipality. The Department of Transportation may in its discretion require the certification of mileage on a biennial basis.

For purposes of this section and of

G.S. 136-41.2

and 136-41.3, urban service districts defined by the governing board of a consolidated city-county in which street services are provided by the consolidated city-county, as defined by

G.S. 160B-2(1)

, shall be considered eligible municipalities, and the allocations to be made thereby shall be made to the government of the consolidated city-county.

Any funds allocated to the unincorporated area known as the Butner Reservation shall be transferred to the Town of Butner.

Nature. — The General Assembly finds that the revenue distributed under this section is local revenue, not a State expenditure, for the purpose of Section 5(3) of Article III of the North Carolina Constitution. Therefore, the Governor may not reduce or withhold the distribution.

History.

1951, c. 260, s. 2; c. 948, ss. 2, 3; 1953, c. 1127; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1963, c. 854, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 665, ss. 1, 2; 1971, c. 182, ss. 1-3; 1973, c. 476, s. 193; c. 500, s. 1; c. 507, s. 5; c. 537, s. 6; 1975, c. 513; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1137, s. 50; 1981, c. 690, s. 4; c. 859, s. 9.2; c. 1127, s. 54; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 982, s. 1; 1989, c. 692, s. 1.6; 1995, c. 390, s. 26; c. 461, s. 18; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2000-165, s. 1; 2002-120, s. 5; 2007-269, s. 13; 2011-145, s. 28.10(a); 2013-183, s. 3.1; 2014-100, s. 34.1; 2015-241, s. 29.17D(a).

Local Modification.

Cherokee: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1049, s. 13(a); Henderson: 1957, c. 1181; village of Grandfather: 1987, c. 419, s. 1; village of Woodlake: 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 859, s. 1 (contingent on referendum).

Cross References.

As to estimate of population authorizing participation in state-collected funds, see

G.S. 160A-486

.

§ 136-41.2.
Eligibility for funds; municipalities incorporated since January 1, 1945.

No municipality shall be eligible to receive funds under

G.S. 136-41.1

unless it has conducted the most recent election required by its charter or the general law, whichever is applicable, for the purpose of electing municipal officials. The literal requirement that the most recent required election shall have been held may be waived only:

Where the members of the present governing body were appointed by the General Assembly in the act of incorporation and the date for the first election of officials under the terms of that act has not arrived; or,

Where validly appointed or elected officials have advertised notice of election in accordance with law, but have not actually conducted an election for the reason that no candidates offered themselves for office.

No municipality shall be eligible to receive funds under

G.S. 136-41.1

unless it has levied an ad valorem tax for the current fiscal year of at least five cents (5¢) on the one hundred dollars ($100.00) valuation upon all taxable property within its corporate limits, and unless it has actually collected at least fifty percent (50%) of the total ad valorem tax levied for the preceding fiscal year; provided, however, that, for failure to have collected the required percentage of its ad valorem tax levy for the preceding fiscal year:

No municipality making in any year application for its first annual allocation shall be declared ineligible to receive such allocation; and

No municipality shall be declared ineligible to receive its share of the annual allocation to be made in the year 1964.

No municipality shall be eligible to receive funds under

G.S. 136-41.1

unless it has formally adopted a budget ordinance in substantial compliance with

G.S. 159-8

and

G.S. 159-13

, showing revenue received from all sources, and showing that funds have been appropriated for at least two of the following municipal services if the municipality was incorporated with an effective date prior to January 1, 2000, water distribution; sewage collection or disposal; garbage and refuse collection or disposal; fire protection; police protection; street maintenance, construction, or right-of-way acquisition; or street lighting, or at least four of the following municipal services if the municipality was incorporated with an effective date of on or after January 1, 2000: (i) police protection; (ii) fire protection; (iii) solid waste collection or disposal; (iv) water distribution; (v) street maintenance; (vi) street construction or right-of-way acquisition; (vii) street lighting; and (viii) zoning.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any municipality incorporated prior to January 1, 1945.

History.

1963, c. 854, ss. 3, 31/2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 934, ss. 5, 6; 1999-458, s. 5; 2017-102, s. 20.

Local Modification.

Town of Red Cross: 2005-245, s. 2 (fiscal year 2002-2003 only); Community of Gray’s Creek: 1999-458, s. 13 (contingent on petition filed before July 1, 2002); Community of Union Cross: 1999-458, s. 13 (contingent on petition filed before July 1, 2002).

§ 136-41.2A.
Eligibility for funds; municipalities incorporated before January 1, 1945.

No municipality shall be eligible to receive funds under

G.S. 136-41.1

unless it has been within the four-year period next preceding the annual allocation of funds conducted an election for the purpose of electing municipal officials and currently imposes an ad valorem tax or provides other funds for the general operating expenses of the municipality.

The provisions of this section apply only to municipalities incorporated prior to January 1, 1945.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 934, s. 4.

§ 136-41.2B.
Eligibility for funds; municipalities with no road miles ineligible.

No municipality shall be eligible to receive funds under

G.S. 136-41.1

unless the municipality maintains public streets that (i) are within its jurisdiction and (ii) do not form a part of the State highway system.

History.

2011-145, s. 28.10(b).